Utah statutes.
39-6-8.   Arrest.
(1)  "Arrest" means the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a
punishment for an offense, directing the person to remain within a specified
area.
(2)  An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any
commanding officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or
through persons subject to this chapter, or through a person authorized by
this chapter to apprehend persons.  A commanding officer may authorize warrant
officers or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of his command
or subject to his authority into arrest or confinement.
(3)  A commissioned officer or warrant officer may be ordered apprehended, or
ordered into arrest or confinement, only by a commanding officer to whose
authority he is subject, and only by an order, oral or written, delivered in
person or by another commissioned officer.  The authority to order the person
apprehended or into arrest or confinement may not be delegated.
(4)  A person may not be apprehended or placed under arrest or confinement
except upon probable cause.
(5)  This section does not limit a person authorized to apprehend offenders in
his securing the custody of an alleged offender until the proper authority may
be notified.
